California statutes. Business and Professions Code
“The decision of the Real Estate Commissioner on the application of ____is to pay $____ from the Consumer Recovery Account. A copy of that decision is enclosed.

“Pursuant to Section 10475 of the Business and Professions Code, all of your licenses and license rights under the Real Estate Law will be suspended effective on the date of the payment, and you will not be eligible for reinstatement of any license issued under authority of the Real Estate Law until
 you have reimbursed the Consumer Recovery Account for this payment plus interest at the prevailing legal rate.

“If you desire a judicial review of the suspension of your licenses and license rights, you may petition the superior court for a writ of mandamus. If the underlying judgment is a California state court judgment, the petition shall be filed in the court in which the judgment was entered. If the underlying judgment is a federal court judgment, the petition shall be filed in the superior court of any county within California that would have been a proper venue if the underlying lawsuit had been filed in a California state court, or in the Superior Court of the County of Sacramento. To be timely, the petition must be filed with the court within 30 days of receipt of this notice.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 786, Sec. 27.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10471.6.

If, at any time prior to the rendering of a decision on an application, the commissioner makes a preliminary determination that the aggregate valid applications of all aggrieved persons against that licensee are likely to exceed the limits of liability in Section 10474, the commissioner shall, in lieu of further administrative proceedings, initiate a proration proceeding pursuant to Section 10474.5 in a superior court of any county in this state that would be a proper court for the filing of a denied application or writ of mandamus pursuant to Section
 10471.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 389, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

10472.

(a) A claimant against whom the commissioner has rendered a decision denying an application pursuant to Section 10471 may, within six months after the mailing of the notice of the denial, file a verified application in superior court for an Order Directing Payment Out of the Consumer Recovery Account based upon the grounds set forth in the application to the commissioner. If the underlying judgment is a California state court judgment, the application shall be filed in the court in which the underlying judgment was entered. If the underlying judgment is a federal court judgment, the application shall be filed in the superior court of any county within California that would have been a proper venue if the underlying lawsuit had been filed in a
 California state court, or in the Superior Court of the County of Sacramento.

(b) A copy of the verified application shall be served upon the commissioner and upon the judgment debtor. A certificate or affidavit of service shall be filed by the claimant with the court. Service on the commissioner may be made by certified mail addressed to the headquarters office of the bureau. Service upon a judgment debtor may be made in accordance with Section 10471.1. The notice served upon the judgment debtor shall read as follows:

“NOTICE: An application has been filed with the court for a payment from the Consumer Recovery Account that was previously denied by the Real Estate Commissioner.

“If the Department of Real Estate makes a payment from the Consumer
 Recovery Account pursuant to a court order, all of your licenses and license rights under the Real Estate Law may be suspended until the Consumer Recovery Account has been reimbursed for the amount paid plus interest at the prevailing rate.

“If you wish to defend in court against this application, you must file a written response with the court within 30 days after having been served with a copy of the application. If you do not file a written response, you will have waived your right to defend against the application.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 786, Sec. 28.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10472.1.

(a) The commissioner and the judgment debtor shall each have 30 days after being served with the application in which to file a written response. The court shall thereafter set the matter for hearing upon the petition of the claimant. The court shall grant a request of the commissioner for a continuance of as much as 30 days and may, upon a showing of good cause by any party, continue the hearing as the court deems appropriate.

(b) The claimant shall have the burden of proving compliance with the requirements of Section 10471 by competent evidence at an evidentiary hearing. The claimant shall be entitled to a de novo review of the merits of the application as contained in the
 administrative record.

(c) If the judgment debtor fails to file a written response to the application, the application may be compromised or settled by the commissioner at any time during the court proceedings and the court shall, upon joint petition of the claimant and the commissioner, issue an order directing payment out of the Consumer Recovery Account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 712, Sec. 23.   (SB 706)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10473.

Whenever the court proceeds upon an application under Section 10472, it shall order payment out of the Consumer Recovery Account only upon a determination that the aggrieved party has a valid cause of action within the purview of Section 10471, and has complied with Section 10472.

The commissioner may defend any such action on behalf of the Consumer Recovery Account and shall have recourse to all appropriate means of defense and review, including examination of witnesses and the right to relitigate any issues material and relevant in the proceeding against the Consumer Recovery Account which were determined in the underlying action on which the judgment in favor of the applicant was based. If the judgment in favor of the
 applicant was by default, stipulation, consent, or pursuant to Section 594 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or whenever the action against the licensee was defended by a trustee in bankruptcy, the applicant shall have the burden of proving that the cause of action against the licensee was for fraud, misrepresentation, deceit, or conversion of trust funds. Otherwise, the judgment shall create a rebuttable presumption of the fraud, misrepresentation, deceit, or conversion of trust funds by the licensee, which presumption shall affect the burden of producing evidence.

The commissioner may move the court at any time to dismiss the application when it appears there are no triable issues and the petition is without merit. The motion may be supported by affidavit of any person or persons having knowledge of the facts, and may be made on the basis that the petition, and the judgment referred to therein, does not form the basis for a meritorious recovery claim within the
 purview of Section 10471; provided, however, the commissioner shall give written notice at least 10 days before the motion.

The commissioner may, subject to court approval, compromise a claim based upon the application of an aggrieved party. The commissioner shall not be bound by any compromise or stipulation of the judgment debtor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 712, Sec. 24.   (SB 706)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10473.1.

The judgment debtor may defend an action against the Consumer Recovery Account on their own behalf and shall have recourse to all appropriate means of defense and review, including examination of witnesses. All matters, including, but not limited to, the issues of fraud, misrepresentation, deceit, or conversion of trust funds, finally adjudicated in the underlying action are conclusive as to the judgment debtor and the applicant in the proceeding against the Consumer Recovery Account, if the final judgment was established by proof by clear and convincing evidence or the commissioner determined that the applicant provided clear and convincing evidence of the judgment debtor’s fraud, misrepresentation, deceit, or conversion of trust
 funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 786, Sec. 29.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10474.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter and regardless of the number of persons aggrieved or parcels of real estate involved in a transaction or the number of judgments against a licensee, the liability of the Consumer Recovery Account shall not exceed the following amounts:

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), causes of action which occurred on or after January 1, 1980, twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for any one transaction and one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for any one licensee.

(b) For applications for payment from the Consumer Recovery Account filed on or after January 1, 2009, fifty thousand dollars
 ($50,000) for any one transaction and two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for any one licensee.

(c) When multiple licensed real estate personnel are involved in a transaction and the individual conduct of two or more of the licensees results in a judgment meeting the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 10471, the claimant may seek recovery from the Consumer Recovery Account based on the judgment against any of the licensed real estate personnel, subject to the limitations of this section and subparagraph (E) of paragraph (7) of subdivision (c) of Section 10471.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 712, Sec. 26.   (SB 706)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10474.5.

If the amount of liability of the Consumer Recovery Account as provided for in Section 10474 is insufficient to pay in full the valid claims of all aggrieved persons by whom claims have been filed against any one licensee, the amount shall be distributed among them in the ratio that their respective claims bear to the aggregate of the valid claims, or in any other manner as the court deems equitable. Distribution of any moneys shall be among the persons entitled to share therein, without regard to the order of priority in which their respective judgments may have been obtained or their claims have been filed. Upon petition of the commissioner, the court may require all claimants and prospective claimants against one licensee to be joined in one action, to the end
 that the respective rights of all claimants to the Consumer Recovery Account may be equitably adjudicated and settled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 712, Sec. 27.   (SB 706)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10475.

Should the commissioner pay from the Consumer Recovery Account any amount in settlement of a claim or toward satisfaction of a judgment against a licensed broker or salesperson or a person holding a prepaid rental listing service license, the license of the broker or salesperson or prepaid rental listing service licensee shall be automatically suspended upon the date of payment from the Consumer Recovery Account if the final judgment was established by proof by clear and convincing evidence or the commissioner determined that the claimant provided clear and convincing evidence of the fraud, misrepresentation, deceit, or conversion of trust funds. No broker or salesperson or prepaid rental listing service licensee shall be granted reinstatement until they have
 repaid in full, plus interest at the prevailing legal rate applicable to a judgment rendered in any court of this state, the amount paid from the Consumer Recovery Account on their account. A discharge in bankruptcy shall not relieve a person from the penalties and disabilities provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 786, Sec. 30.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10476.

If, at any time, the money deposited in the Consumer Recovery Account is insufficient to satisfy any duly authorized claim or portion thereof, the commissioner shall, when sufficient money has been deposited in the Consumer Recovery Account, satisfy the unpaid claims or portions thereof, in the order that the claims or portions thereof were originally filed, plus accumulated interest at the rate of 4 percent a year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 712, Sec. 29.   (SB 706)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10477.

Any sums received by the commissioner pursuant to any provisions of this chapter shall be deposited in the State Treasury and credited to the Consumer Recovery Account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 712, Sec. 30.   (SB 706)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10478.

It shall be unlawful for any person or the agent of any person to file with the commissioner any notice, statement, or other document required under the provisions of this chapter which is false or untrue or contains any willful, material misstatement of fact. Such conduct shall constitute a public offense punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for a period of not more than one year or a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 690, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 690.)
-------------------------------------------

10479.

When, the commissioner has paid from the Consumer Recovery Account any sum to the judgment creditor, the commissioner shall be subrogated to all of the rights of the judgment creditor and the judgment creditor shall assign all of his or her right, title, and interest in the judgment to the commissioner and any amount and interest so recovered by the commissioner on the judgment shall be deposited to the Consumer Recovery Account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 712, Sec. 31.   (SB 706)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10480.

The failure of an aggrieved person to comply with all of the provisions of this chapter shall constitute a waiver of any rights hereunder.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 690, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 690.)
-------------------------------------------

10481.

Nothing in this chapter limits the authority of the commissioner to take disciplinary action against any licensee for a violation of the Real Estate Law, or of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11000) of Part 2, or of the rules and regulations of the commissioner; nor shall the repayment in full of all obligations to the Consumer Recovery Account by any licensee nullify or modify the effect of any other disciplinary proceeding brought pursuant to the Real Estate Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 712, Sec. 32.   (SB 706)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Mineral, Oil and Gas Brokerage [10500. - 10580.]



  ARTICLE 1. Scope of Regulation [10500. - 10513.]

10500.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 10131.4 and this chapter, it is unlawful for any person to engage in any of the following acts for another or others for compensation or in expectation of compensation, unless the person is licensed as a mineral, oil, and gas broker or a real estate broker:

(a) To sell or offer for sale, buy or offer to buy, solicit prospective sellers or purchasers, solicit or obtain listings, or negotiate the purchase, sale, or exchange of mineral, oil, or gas property.

(b) To solicit borrowers or lenders for or negotiate loans on mineral, oil, or gas property, or collect payments for lenders in connection with these loans.

(c) To lease or offer to lease or negotiate the sale, purchase, or exchange of leases on mineral, oil, or gas property.

(d) To rent or place for rent, mineral, oil, or gas property or to collect rent or royalties from mineral, oil, or gas property or improvements thereon.

(e) Other than as an officer or employee of the state or federal government, to assist or offer to assist another or others in filing an application for the purchase or lease of, or to locate or enter upon mineral, oil, or gas property owned by the state or federal government.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 416, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10500.5.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 10131.45 and in this chapter, it is unlawful for any person to engage in the following businesses as a principal unless the person is licensed as a mineral, oil, and gas broker or a real estate broker:

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 10502, buying or leasing, or taking an option on mineral, oil, or gas property for the purpose of sale, exchange, lease, sublease, or assignment of a lease of the property or any part of the property.

(b) Offering mining claims or any interest therein for sale or assignment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 416, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10501.

(a) The Real Estate Commissioner may file a complaint for any violation of Section 10500 or 10500.5 before any court of competent jurisdiction, and the commissioner and the commissioner’s counsel, deputies or assistants may assist in presenting the law or facts at the trial.

(b) It is the duty of the district attorney of the county in which a violation of Section 10500 or 10500.5 occurs to prosecute the violation.

(c) A natural person convicted of a violation of Section 10500 or 10500.5 shall be punished by a fine of not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) or by imprisonment in the county jail for a term not to exceed six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment, in the discretion of the court. A corporation convicted of a violation of Section 10500 or 10500.5 shall be punished by a fine of not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 268, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10502.

A mineral, oil and gas broker license shall not be required to engage in any of the following activities with respect to a mineral, oil or gas property:

(a) To act as a depository under an oil lease, gas lease or oil and gas lease other than for purpose of sale.

(b) To engage in any transaction subject to an order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

(c) To engage in the business of drilling for or producing oil or gas or mining for or producing minerals.

(d) To negotiate leases or agreements between an owner of mineral, oil or gas lands, leases or mineral rights on the one hand, and a person organized for or engaging in oil or gas or mineral or metal production on the other, or to enter into leases or agreements with an owner of mineral, oil, or gas lands, leases, or mineral rights on behalf of a disclosed or undisclosed person organized for or engaging in oil or gas or mineral or metal production.

(e) To deal with mineral rights or land, other than oil or gas rights or land, as the owner of the rights or land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 268, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

10503.

Mineral, oil or gas property refers to land used for, intended to be used for, or concerning which representations are made with respect to, the mining of minerals or the extraction of oil or gas therefrom.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 749.)
-------------------------------------------

10508.

No person engaged in the business or acting in the capacity of a mineral, oil and gas broker within this state shall bring or maintain any action in the courts of this state for the collection of compensation for the performance of any of the acts mentioned in this article without alleging and proving that he was a duly licensed mineral, oil and gas broker at the time the alleged cause of action arose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 747.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.

(a) It is unlawful for a mineral, oil, and gas broker or a real estate broker to compensate, directly or indirectly, any person who is not a mineral, oil, and gas broker or a licensed real estate salesperson retained by the real estate broker for performing any acts for which a mineral, oil, and gas broker license is required.

(b) It is a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense, for any person, whether obligor, escrow holder, or otherwise, to pay or deliver compensation to a person for performing any acts for which a mineral, oil, and gas broker license is required unless that person is known by the payer to be or has presented evidence to the payer that he or she was a
 licensed mineral, oil, and gas broker at the time the compensation was earned.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 52.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10512.

Every officer, agent or employee of any company, and every other person who knowingly authorizes, directs or aids in the publication, advertisement, distribution or circularization of any false statement or representation concerning any mineral, oil or gas property, or, if the mineral, oil or gas property is owned by the state or federal government, which such person offers to assist another or others to file an application for the purchase or lease of, or to locate or enter upon, and every person who, with knowledge that any advertisement, pamphlet, prospectus or letter concerning any mineral, oil or gas property or any written statement that is false or fraudulent, issues, circulates, publishes or distributes the same, or causes the same to be issued, circulated, published or distributed, or who in any other respect willfully violates or fails, omits, or neglects to obey, observe or comply with any order, permit, decision, demand or requirement of the commissioner under the provisions of this part relating to mineral, oil and gas brokerage, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for a term not to exceed six months, or by a fine of not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), and, if a mineral, oil and gas licensee, he shall be held to trial by the commissioner for a suspension or revocation of his mineral, oil and gas license, as provided in the provisions of this part relating to hearings. It shall be the duty of the district attorney of each county in this state to prosecute all violations of the provisions of this section in respective counties in which the violations occur.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 43.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

10513.

In performing acts within the scope and under the authority of this chapter, mineral, oil and gas brokers are subject to the provisions applicable to real estate brokers contained in Sections 10131.5, 10140.5, 10142, 10143.5, 10144, 10145, and 10148.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 268, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Licenses [10515. - 10519.1.]

10515.

(a) Mineral, oil, and gas brokers in performing acts within the scope and under the authority of this chapter are subject to the provisions applicable to real estate brokers contained in Sections 10153.6, 10156.2, 10157, 10159, 10159.2, 10159.5, 10161.5, 10161.75, 10162, 10163, and 10165.

(b) Mineral, oil, and gas brokers shall not be subject to any of the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 10150) or Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 10170) of Chapter 3 which impose continuing education requirements as a prerequisite to the renewal of a license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 416, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10519.

(a) The commissioner may issue a restricted mineral, oil, and gas broker license to a person whose mineral, oil, and gas broker license has been revoked as the result of disciplinary action taken by the commissioner.

(b) A restricted mineral, oil, and gas broker license issued by the commissioner may be restricted by term and by the conditions to be observed by the licensee in the performance of acts for which a mineral, oil and gas broker license is required including the posting of a surety bond by the restricted licensee in such form and condition as the commissioner may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 416, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10519.1.

There is no property right and no right to the renewal of a restricted license issued pursuant to Section 10519.

The commissioner may suspend a restricted license pending the holding of a hearing on charges alleging a basis for disciplinary action against the restricted licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 268, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Disciplinary Action [10560. - 10564.]

10560.

Upon grounds provided in this article and the other articles of this chapter, the license of any mineral, oil and gas licensee may be revoked or suspended in accordance with the provisions of this part relating to hearings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 749.)
-------------------------------------------

10561.

The commissioner may, upon his or her own motion, and shall, upon the verified complaint in writing of any person, investigate the actions of any person engaged in the business or acting in the capacity of a mineral, oil, and gas licensee, within this state, and he or she may temporarily suspend or permanently revoke a mineral, oil, and gas license at any time if the licensee, while a mineral, oil, and gas licensee, in performing or attempting
 to perform any of the acts within the scope of this chapter, has been guilty of any of the following:

(a) Making any substantial misrepresentation.

(b) Making any false promises of a character likely to influence, persuade, or induce.

(c) Acting for more than one party in a transaction without the knowledge or consent of all parties thereto.

(d) Commingling with his or her own money or property the money or property of others that is received and held by him or her.

(e) Claiming or demanding a fee, compensation, or commission under any exclusive agreement authorizing or employing a licensee to sell, buy, or exchange mineral, oil, or gas property for compensation, or commission where that
 agreement does not contain a definite, specified date of final and complete termination.

(f) Claiming or taking by a licensee of any secret or undisclosed amount of compensation, commission, or profit, or the failure of a licensee to reveal to the employer of such licensee the full amount of the licensee’s compensation, commission, or profit under any agreement authorizing or employing the licensee to do any acts for which a license is required under this chapter for compensation or commission prior to or coincident with the signing of an agreement evidencing the meeting of the minds of the contracting parties, regardless of the form of such agreement, whether evidenced by documents in an escrow or by any other or different procedure.

(g) The use by a licensee of any provision allowing the licensee an option to purchase in an agreement authorizing or employing the licensee to
 sell, buy, or exchange mineral, oil, or gas property for compensation or commission, except when the licensee prior to or coincident with election to exercise the option to purchase reveals in writing to the employer the full amount of the licensee’s profit and obtains the written consent of the employer approving the amount of that profit.

(h) Any other conduct, whether of the same or a different character than specified in this section, which constitutes fraud or dishonest dealing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 53.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10562.

The commissioner may suspend or revoke the license of a mineral, oil, and gas licensee who has done any of the following:

(a) Entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to, or been found guilty of, or been convicted of, a felony, or a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a mineral, oil, and gas licensee, and the time for appeal has elapsed or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, irrespective of an order granting probation following that
 conviction, suspending the imposition of sentence, or of a subsequent order under the provision of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing the licensee to withdraw his or her plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation or information.

(b) Knowingly authorized, directed, connived at or aided in the publication, advertisement, distribution, or circulation of a material false statement or representation concerning his or her business or a mineral, oil, or gas property offered for sale.

(c) Willfully disregarded or violated any of the provisions of the Real Estate Law (commencing with Section 10000) or of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11000) of Part 2 or of the rules and regulations of the commissioner for the administration and enforcement of the Real Estate Law and Chapter 1 (commencing with Section
 11000) of Part 2.

(d) Acted or conducted himself or herself in a manner which would have warranted the denial of his or her application for a mineral, oil, and gas license.

(e) Willfully used the term “realtor” or a trade name or insigne of membership in a real estate organization of which the licensee is not a member.

(f) Demonstrated negligence or incompetence in performing an act for which he or she is required to hold a license.

(g) Has used his or her employment by a governmental agency in a capacity giving access to records, other than public records, in a manner that violates the confidential nature of the records.

(h) Any other conduct, whether of the same or a different character
 than specified in this section, which constitutes fraud or dishonest dealing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 140, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

10562.5.

When a final judgment is obtained in a civil action against any mineral, oil and gas licensee upon grounds of fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit with reference to any transaction for which a license is required under this division, the commissioner may, after hearing in accordance with the provisions of this part relating to hearings, suspend or revoke the license of such mineral, oil and gas licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 760.)
-------------------------------------------

10564.

The commissioner may suspend or revoke the mineral, oil, and gas license of a corporation as to any officer or agent acting under its mineral, oil, and gas license, without revoking the mineral, oil, and gas license of the corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 416, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Fees [10580. - 10580.]

10580.

Mineral, oil, and gas brokers are subject to the provisions applicable to real estate brokers contained in Sections 10200, 10207, 10209.5, 10210, 10211, and 10222.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 416, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. REGULATION OF TRANSACTIONS [11000. - 11288.]



  CHAPTER 1. Subdivided Lands [11000. - 11200.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [11000. - 11008.]

11000.

(a) “Subdivided lands” and “subdivision” refer to improved or unimproved land or lands, wherever situated within California, divided or proposed to be divided for the purpose of sale or lease or financing, whether immediate or future, into five or more lots or parcels. However, land or lands sold by lots or parcels of not less than 160 acres which are designated by lot or parcel description by government surveys and appear as such on the current assessment roll of the county in which the land or lands are situated shall not be deemed to be “subdivided lands” or “a subdivision” within the meaning of this section, unless the land or lands are divided or proposed to be divided for the purpose of sale for oil and gas purposes, in which case the land or lands shall be deemed to be “subdivided lands” or “a subdivision” within the meaning of this section. This chapter also does not apply to the leasing of apartments, offices, stores, or similar space within an apartment building, industrial building, commercial building, or mobilehome park, as defined under Section 18214 of the Health and Safety Code, except that the offering of leases for a term in excess of five years to tenants within a mobilehome park as a mandatory requirement and prerequisite to tenancy within the mobilehome park shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter. The leasing of apartments in a community apartment project, as defined in Section 11004 in an apartment or similar space within a commercial building or complex, shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter.

(b) Nothing in this section shall in any way modify or affect any of the provisions of Section 66424 of the Government Code.

(c) Subdivisions, as defined in Section 10249.1, which are located entirely outside California shall be exempt from the provisions of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

11000.1.

(a) “Subdivided lands” and “subdivision,” as defined by Sections 11000 and 11004.5, also include improved or unimproved land or lands, a lot or lots, or a parcel or parcels, of any size, in which, for the purpose of sale or lease or financing, whether immediate or future, five or more undivided interests are created or are proposed to be created.

(b) This section does not apply to the creation or proposed creation of undivided interests in land if any one of the following conditions exists:

(1) The undivided interests are held or to be held by persons related one to the other by blood or marriage.

(2) The undivided interests are to be
 purchased and owned solely by persons who present evidence satisfactory to the Real Estate Commissioner that they are knowledgeable and experienced investors who comprehend the nature and extent of the risks involved in the ownership of these interests. The Real Estate Commissioner shall grant an exemption from this part if the undivided interests are to be purchased by no more than 10 persons, each of whom furnishes a signed statement to the commissioner that the person (A) is fully informed concerning the real property to be acquired and the person’s interest in that property including the risks involved in ownership of undivided interests, (B) is purchasing the interest or interests for the person’s own account and with no present intention to resell or otherwise dispose of the interest for value, and (C) expressly waives protections afforded to a purchaser by this part.

(3) The undivided interests are created as the result of a foreclosure
 sale.

(4) The undivided interests are created by a valid order or decree of a court.

(5) The offering and sale of the undivided interests have been expressly qualified by the issuance of a permit from the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation pursuant to the Corporate Securities Law of 1968 (Division 1 (commencing with Section 25000) of Title 4 of the Corporations Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 11.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

11000.2.

(a) A person who has made an offer to purchase an interest in an undivided-interest subdivision specified in subdivision (a) of, and not exempted by subdivision (b) of, Section 11000.1 shall have the right to rescind any contract resulting from the acceptance of that offer until midnight of the third calendar day following the day on which the prospective purchaser executed the offer to purchase.

(b) The owner of a subdivision subject to this section or his or her agent shall, in accordance with regulations adopted by the Real Estate Commissioner, clearly and conspicuously disclose to all prospective purchasers of undivided interests the right of rescission provided for in subdivision (a), and shall furnish to each offeror a form, as prescribed by regulations of the commissioner, for the exercise of the right of rescission.

(c) Any certificate bearing the signature of the purchaser of an interest in an undivided-interest subdivision subject to this section which contains an adequate description of the interest or interests sold and a statement by the purchaser that he or she has not exercised the right of rescission within the time limit set forth in subdivision (a) shall constitute conclusive evidence that the right of rescission has not been exercised in any matter involving the rights of a third party who has acted in good faith in reliance upon representations in the certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 434, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11001.

The Real Estate Commissioner (hereafter referred to in this chapter as the commissioner) may adopt, amend, or repeal such rules and regulations as are reasonably necessary for the enforcement of this chapter. The commissioner may issue any order, permit, decision, demand, or requirement to effect this purpose. These rules, regulations, and orders shall be adopted pursuant to the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 786, Sec. 31.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

11003.

“Planned development” has the same meaning as specified in Section 4175 or 6562 of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 181, Sec. 4) by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 2.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

11003.2.

“Stock cooperative” has the same meaning as specified in Section 4190 or 6566 of the Civil Code, except that, as used in this chapter, a “stock cooperative” does not include a limited-equity housing cooperative.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 181, Sec. 5) by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 3.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

11003.4.

(a) A “limited-equity housing cooperative” or a “workforce housing cooperative trust” is a corporation that meets the criteria of Section 11003.2 and that also meets the criteria of Sections 817 and 817.1 of the Civil Code, as applicable. Except as provided in subdivision (b), a limited-equity housing or workforce housing cooperative trust shall be subject to all the requirements of this chapter pertaining to stock cooperatives.

(b) A limited-equity housing cooperative or a workforce housing cooperative trust shall be exempt from the requirements of this chapter if the limited-equity housing cooperative or workforce housing cooperative trust complies with all the following conditions:

(1) The United